Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6318.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-51-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-51 entitled "School Bus
Safety Enforcement" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-51-2. Live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring systems.
(a) All school departments of this state are hereby authorized to Every school bus placed
in service shall install and operate live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring
systems. Such systems shall at a minimum, be systems which monitor and detect school bus traffic
violations. For purposes of this chapter a live digital video school bus violation detection
monitoring system means a system with one or more camera sensors and computers which produce
live digital and recorded video of motor vehicles being operated in violation of school bus traffic
laws. All systems installed for used under this chapter must, at a minimum, produce a live visual
image viewable remotely, a recorded image of the license plate, and be able to record the time,
date, and location of the vehicle, and a signed affidavit by a person who witnessed the violation via
live video.
(b) The school departments may enter into an agreement with a private corporation or other
entity to provide live digital video school bus violation detection monitoring systems and to
maintain and operate such systems.
(c) The provisions of this section shall apply to all school buses including, but not limited
to, school buses used exclusively for the transportation of students receiving special education

pursuant to chapter 24 of title 16.
SECTION 2. Chapter 31-23 of the General Laws entitled "Equipment and Accessories
Generally" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-23-59. School bus stop signs required.
(a) Every school bus placed in service shall be equipped with a retractable stop sign
mounted outside the bus. The retractable stop sign mounted outside the bus shall be visible from a
distance of not less than one hundred feet (100′). The method of installation for the retractable stop
sign shall be approved and certified by the division of motor vehicles. This system shall be
inspected at all regularly scheduled inspections.
(b) When the driver of the school bus has picked up students, the bus shall remain stopped,
with stop sign in a position visible to other motorists until all students are seated. Prior to any
student being permitted to disembark from the bus, the driver shall look to see that all approaching
traffic has stopped and observed the stop sign. After students have disembarked from the bus, the
driver shall allow ample time for the students to clear the bus area before closing the doors and
then, after remaining stopped for approximately ten (10) seconds, the driver shall announce through
public address system that the bus will proceed.
(c) The department of elementary and secondary education shall require a demonstration
of the operation of the retractable stop sign at each school which shall take place at least two (2)
times per year, one of which shall take place during the month of September.
(d) The provisions of this section shall apply to all school buses including, but not limited
to, school buses used exclusively for the transportation of students receiving special education
pursuant to chapter 24 of title 16.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002871
========
LC002871 - Page 2 of 3